Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska38-1089
Salon license; change of ownership or location; effect.

Each salon license issued shall be in effect solely for the owner or owners and premises named thereon and shall expire automatically upon any change of ownership or location. An original application for licensure shall be submitted and approved before such salon may reopen for business.

Laws 1986, LB 318, § 88;

R.S.1943, (2003), § 71-3,127;

Laws 2007, LB463, § 351.